Hawaii statutes.
[§707-714.5] Criminally negligent
storage of a firearm. (1) A person commits the offense of criminally
negligent storage of a firearm if the person violates section 134-10.5 and a
minor obtains the firearm. For purposes of this section, "minor"
means any person under the age of sixteen years.

(2) This section shall not apply if the minor
obtains the firearm as a result of an unlawful entry to any premises by any
person.

(3) Criminally negligent storage of a firearm
is a misdemeanor. [L 1992, c 288, §2]

COMMENTARY ON §707-714.5

Act 288, Session Laws 1992, added this section to establish
that a person can be found criminally negligent for storage of a firearm if a
person keeps a firearm on the premises and the person knows or reasonably
should know that a minor can gain access to the firearm without the permission
of the parent or guardian and that the minor does obtain the firearm.
Conference Committee Report No. 119.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next